Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1035.03
School lands, defined.

School lands are those lands owned or acquired by the state in trust for the support of its common schools as such lands are described in Article VII, section 6, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 1997, LB 345, § 33.